Hawaii statutes.
§342G-42 Office responsibilities for
recycled products procurement. The office, in coordination with the state
procurement office, shall ensure that all state and county purchasing agencies
are provided with the information and technical assistance necessary to promote
the procurement of goods with recycled-content. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §2; am L
1994, c 186, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next